Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Use of Materials Containing Naturally Occurring Asbestos.

Sec. 44.42.400.
Administration and designated areas.

The department shall designate a single employee who reports to the commissioner to oversee the duties assigned to the department in AS

44.42.400

—

44.42.430

and to serve as the point of contact for inquiries related to projects using gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos.

An area that includes land within a municipality or community may be designated by the department as an area in which certain landowners and contractors are granted immunity under AS

09.65.245(a)

for causing asbestos-related injuries only if the municipality or community requests that designation. A municipality or community may request to become an area designated by the department under this subsection by submitting an application to the department. The department may approve an application received under this subsection only after reviewing tests documenting the presence of naturally occurring asbestos in that area, analyzing the effect of the presence of naturally occurring asbestos on construction projects in the area, considering the availability of gravel or other aggregate material free from naturally occurring asbestos in the area, and soliciting public input from residents in the affected municipality or community. The department may require a municipality or community that applies to become a designated area to provide the department with tests documenting the presence of naturally occurring asbestos, information related to the effect of the presence of naturally occurring asbestos on construction projects in the area, information related to availability of gravel or other aggregate material free from naturally occurring asbestos, and other information relevant to the application. After designating an area after approval of an application under this subsection, the department shall notify, including through signage, potentially affected persons that the area has been designated as an area where immunity may be granted under AS

09.65.245(a)

for certain landowners and contractors causing asbestos-related injuries.

In places that do not include a municipality or community, the department may designate an area in which certain landowners and contractors are granted immunity under AS

09.65.245(a)

for causing asbestos-related injuries. Before designating an area under this subsection, the department shall document the presence of naturally occurring asbestos in that area, analyze the effect of the presence of naturally occurring asbestos on construction projects in the area, consider the availability of gravel or other aggregate material free from naturally occurring asbestos in the area, and solicit public input from potentially affected persons. After designating an area under this subsection, the department shall notify, including through signage, potentially affected persons that the area has been designated as an area where immunity may be granted under AS

09.65.245(a)

for certain landowners and contractors causing asbestos-related injuries.

In this section, “community” means a place in the unorganized borough, in a borough, or in a unified municipality that is not incorporated as a municipality, that is not a reserve, and in which 25 or more individuals reside as a social unit.

History.

(§ 3 ch 13 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.42.410.
Site-specific use plan.

To qualify for the immunity provided under AS

09.65.245(a)(2)

, a contractor intending to use, within an area designated by the department under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c), gravel or other aggregate material that, when tested using a bulk test method prescribed by the department in regulation, is determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent of naturally occurring asbestos by mass, shall, after consulting with the owner of the land on which the gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos will be placed, submit a site-specific use plan to the department that

describes the manner in which the proposed use of gravel or other aggregate material that contains naturally occurring asbestos conforms to the standards adopted under AS

44.42.420(b)

;

demonstrates how the proposed construction operation and maintenance practices comply with those that are required and those that are minimally acceptable, as described in AS

44.42.420(b)(5)

, and otherwise meet requirements of law applicable to the handling of compounds that contain asbestos;

outlines the efforts that will be made, as a component of long-term maintenance on the completed project or facility, to ensure that human health and air quality are not compromised by the use of the gravel or other aggregate material that contains naturally occurring asbestos;

describes how the gravel or other aggregate material to be used can be contained underneath the project or buried so that asbestos fibers cannot become airborne or otherwise transferred outside of the project area, except as provided in (5) and (6) of this subsection;

if the requirements in (4) of this subsection are economically unreasonable, describes how the gravel or other aggregate material to be used will be sealed, including chip sealing or mixing with asphalt, in order to prevent asbestos fibers from becoming airborne or otherwise transferred outside of the project area, except as provided in (6) of this subsection; and

if the requirements under (4) and (5) of this subsection are economically unreasonable, describes how the gravel or other aggregate material will be used in order to prevent asbestos from becoming airborne or otherwise transferred outside of the project area, including how the gravel or other aggregate material will be used in order to prevent asbestos from becoming airborne because of vehicle traffic, road maintenance, or grading, if applicable.

To qualify for and preserve the immunity provided under AS

09.65.245(a)(2)

, the department, in its operating procedures applicable to a project that is a transportation facility, including a public highway, airport, or pipeline or railroad track bed, or a public work, as that term is defined in AS

35.95.100

, and for which the contractor intends to use, within an area designated by the department under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c), gravel or other aggregate material that, when tested using a bulk testing method prescribed by the department in regulation, is determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent of naturally occurring asbestos by mass, shall require that

the contractor submit a plan that details the use of gravel or other aggregate material in the construction or maintenance of the transportation project or public facility in accordance with the requirements of (a) of this section and regulations developed under AS

44.42.420

;

before the extraction of the gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos may begin, the plan be approved and returned to the contractor by the department;

the contractor adhere to the monitoring, mitigation, and site-specific use plans.

The department shall review each submitted site-specific use plan and shall work toward approving or disapproving the plan, taking into consideration the construction season in the project location.

The department may not approve a plan for construction with gravel or other aggregate material determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent of naturally occurring asbestos by mass unless

the department determines that it is economically unreasonable to undertake the construction project with gravel or other aggregate material free from naturally occurring asbestos; and

the completed project will not use gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos for a surface application except if the material to be used for the surface application is treated or bound with a surface compound, including chip seal or asphalt, approved by the department.

On receiving a plan that meets the requirements of (a) and (d) of this section and the regulations adopted under AS

44.42.420

, the department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Law, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, shall develop a monitoring and mitigation plan for the project. If the site-specific use plan is approved, the monitoring and mitigation plan developed by the department shall be attached to the site-specific use plan. To qualify for the immunity provided in AS

09.65.245(a)(2)

, the party that has direct control over or responsibility for the monitoring or mitigation shall comply with the monitoring or mitigation plan developed by the department.

On approval of a site-specific use plan, the department

shall provide to the contractor a copy of the approved site-specific use plan that includes

the monitoring and mitigation plan developed under (e) of this section;

a requirement that all asbestos-related data collected by the contractor during or after construction be submitted to the department; and

recommended methods for reducing exposure to airborne asbestos fibers;

shall provide a copy of the site-specific use plan, including the monitoring and mitigation plan, to the mayor or manager of a municipality affected by the use of gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos; and

may provide to the contractor copies of the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration, United States Mine Safety and Health Administration, and United States Environmental Protection Agency recommended practices for handling and use of gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos.

Within 60 days after completing a project in accordance with a site-specific use plan approved by the department, the contractor shall record in the recording district where the property is located a document that includes a description of the affected property, a reference to the most recent recorded conveyance of that property, and a notice indicating the presence of naturally occurring asbestos, and stating that subsequent interest holders may have legal obligations with respect to preventing the naturally occurring asbestos from becoming airborne or otherwise transferred outside of the project area. The contractor shall provide written notification to the department and the landowner that the document has been recorded.

The contractor shall submit to the department the results of any monitoring or testing performed in accordance with the site-specific use plan and any mitigation measures undertaken.

History.

(§ 3 ch 13 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.42.420.
Regulations.

The department, after consultation with the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Law, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, shall prescribe in regulation a bulk testing method for gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos.

The department, after consultation with the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Law, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement AS

44.42.400

—

44.42.430

, including regulations revising statewide standards on the use in the construction and maintenance of transportation projects and public facilities of gravel or other aggregate material that, when tested using a bulk test method prescribed by the department by regulation, is determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent of naturally occurring asbestos by mass. The regulations adopted under this subsection must include

procedures for completing site investigations and characterizations of proposed projects, including the development and description of appropriate laboratory practices;

procedures for reviewing design alternatives and preparing and evaluating appropriate comparative cost analyses that consider the use of gravel or other aggregate material that does not contain naturally occurring asbestos;

procedures for evaluating human health concerns arising out of gravel or other aggregate material that contains naturally occurring asbestos and documentation of methods and means to be used during periods of handling of the gravel or other aggregate material to ensure compliance with appropriate workplace safety and air quality standards relating to the project and to ensure the health and safety of communities affected by construction projects that use gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos;

procedures for preparing designs and design specifications for facilities involving use of gravel or other aggregate material that contains naturally occurring asbestos;

procedures for outlining construction operation and maintenance practices that are required and those that are minimally acceptable to meet requirements of law applicable to the handling of compounds that contain asbestos;

procedures for processing, reviewing, and approving or disapproving site-specific use plans and area designation requests received under AS

44.42.400(b)

in a uniform manner;

guidelines to analyze the cost of a project;

guidelines for determining whether the cost associated with the use of gravel or other aggregate material free from naturally occurring asbestos under AS

44.42.410(d)

is economically unreasonable;

guidelines for determining whether the cost associated with burying or sealing gravel or other aggregate material containing naturally occurring asbestos under AS

44.42.410(a)(2)

and (3) is economically unreasonable;

guidelines for establishing areas designated under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c) that take into account the effect on human health in and around the designated area and environmental factors affecting the transfer of asbestos fibers within and outside of a designated area.

History.

(§ 3 ch 13 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.42.430.
Definitions.

In AS

44.42.400

—

44.42.430

,

“contractor” means the principal construction contractor or, in the absence of an identified principal construction contractor, the person having legal authority for the design and construction of the project;

“naturally occurring asbestos” means chrysotile, amosite, crocidolite, fibrous tremolite, fibrous anthophyllite, and fibrous actinolite asbestos-containing material that has not been processed in an asbestos mill and that, when tested using a bulk method prescribed by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities by regulation, is determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent naturally occurring asbestos by mass.

History.

(§ 3 ch 13 SLA 2012)